Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1614
Nebraska Energy Code; applicability.

The Nebraska Energy Code shall apply to all new buildings, or renovations of or additions to any existing buildings, on which construction is initiated on or after July 1, 2020.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 38;

Laws 1981, LB 2, § 2;

Laws 1983, LB 124, § 15;

Laws 2004, LB 888, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB329, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB405, § 9.